Montana, session 2025, SB496.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Executive residence use policy when governor has alternate
residence -- rulemaking. (1) If the governor informs the department of administration that the governor does
not plan to occupy the executive residence, the department of administration shall notify the legislative services
division of the legislative branch that the executive residence is available for occupancy.
(2) The executive residence must be available for rent by temporary employees of the legislature
during the interim and the legislative session, with preference given to employees with disabilities.
(3) The department of administration, in consultation with the legislative services division, shall
adopt rules to set the occupancy limits, rental fees, and other details to implement this section.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "executive residence" means the state-owned residence
intended for use by the governor located at 2 Carson Street in Helena.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 2, chapter 17, part 8, and the provisions of Title 2, chapter 17, part 8, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 496